Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.800

Revenues derived from certain university lands and income from university permanent fund deposited in University of Washington bond retirement fund—Covenant.

All moneys hereafter received from the lease or rental of lands set apart for the University of Washington by chapter 91, Laws of 1903 and section 9, chapter 122, Laws of 1893, and all interest or income arising from the proceeds of the sale of such land, less the allocation to the state treasurer's service account [fund] pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 and the state investment board expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160, and all proceeds from the sale of timber, fallen timber, stone, gravel, or other valuable material and all other receipts therefrom shall be deposited to the credit of the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" to be expended for the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.20.720. All proceeds of sale of such lands, exclusive of investment income, shall be deposited to the credit of the state university permanent fund, shall be retained therein and shall not be transferred to any other fund or account. All interest earned or income received from the investment of the money in the state university permanent fund shall be deposited to the credit of the University of Washington bond retirement fund less the allocations to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 and the state investment board expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160.

As a part of the contract of sale of bonds payable out of the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the board of regents of the University of Washington may covenant that all moneys derived from the above provided sources, which are required to be paid into the bond retirement fund, shall continue to be paid into such bond retirement fund for as long as any of such bonds are outstanding.

[ 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 97; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.800. Prior: 1965 ex.s. c 135 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.77.620.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.